languages/apertium-nld/apertium-nld.nld.dix
<pardef n="to/nen__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>on</l>        <r>nen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ont</l>       <r>nen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nen</l>       <r>nen<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nen</l>       <r>nen<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="gerund"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>onden</l>     <r>nen<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>onde</l>      <r>nen<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>onde</l>      <r>nen<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>onde</l>      <r>nen<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nend</l>      <r>nen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nen</l>       <r>nen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>on</l>        <r>nen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ont</l>       <r>nen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ont</l>       <r>nen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nen</l>       <r>nen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ne</l>        <r>nen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ne</l>        <r>nen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ne</l>        <r>nen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="slee/ën__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ën<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>ën<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ën</l>        <r>ën<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ën</l>        <r>ën<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="gerund"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>den</l>       <r>ën<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>de</l>        <r>ën<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>de</l>        <r>ën<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>de</l>        <r>ën<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ënd</l>       <r>ën<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ën</l>        <r>ën<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ën<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>ën<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>ën<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ën</l>        <r>ën<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ë</l>         <r>ën<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ë</l>         <r>ën<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ë</l>         <r>ën<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="oli/ën__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>ën<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r>ën<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ën</l>        <r>ën<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ën</l>        <r>ën<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="gerund"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eden</l>      <r>ën<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ede</l>       <r>ën<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ede</l>       <r>ën<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ede</l>       <r>ën<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ënd</l>       <r>ën<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ën</l>        <r>ën<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>ën<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r>ën<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r>ën<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ën</l>        <r>ën<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ë</l>         <r>ën<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ë</l>         <r>ën<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ë</l>         <r>ën<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="fax/en__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>en<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="gerund"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ten</l>       <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>        <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>        <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>        <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>end</l>       <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="barbecueën">      <i>barbecue</i><par n="slee/ën__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bedanken">        <i>bedank</i><par n="fax/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="beklemtonen">     <i>beklemto</i><par n="to/nen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bekronen">        <i>bekro</i><par n="to/nen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="belonen">         <i>belo</i><par n="to/nen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bemerken">        <i>bemerk</i><par n="fax/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bereiken">        <i>bereik</i><par n="fax/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="beschimpen">      <i>beschimp</i><par n="fax/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="betonen">         <i>beto</i><par n="to/nen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="vertolken">       <i>vertolk</i><par n="fax/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bewonen">         <i>bewo</i><par n="to/nen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="biepen">          <i>biep</i><par n="fax/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bonken">          <i>bonk</i><par n="fax/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="briesen">         <i>bries</i><par n="fax/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bruisen">         <i>bruis</i><par n="fax/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="checken">         <i>check</i><par n="fax/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="danken">          <i>dank</i><par n="fax/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dempen">          <i>demp</i><par n="fax/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="doorkruisen">     <i>doorkruis</i><par n="fax/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="douchen">         <i>douch</i><par n="fax/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="eisen">           <i>eis</i><par n="fax/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="fietsen">         <i>fiets</i><par n="fax/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="frunniken">       <i>frunnik</i><par n="fax/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="glimlachen">      <i>glimlach</i><par n="fax/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="gutsen">          <i>guts</i><par n="fax/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="hergebruiken">    <i>hergebruik</i><par n="fax/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="hinniken">        <i>hinnik</i><par n="fax/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="hurken">          <i>hurk</i><par n="fax/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="janken">          <i>jank</i><par n="fax/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="juichen">         <i>juich</i><par n="fax/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="kalken">          <i>kalk</i><par n="fax/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="kenmerken">       <i>kenmerk</i><par n="fax/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="kieken">          <i>kiek</i><par n="fax/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="klutsen">         <i>kluts</i><par n="fax/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="kontneuken">      <i>kontneuk</i><par n="fax/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="kreuken">         <i>kreuk</i><par n="fax/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="kronen">          <i>kro</i><par n="to/nen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="kuchen">          <i>kuch</i><par n="fax/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="kuisen">          <i>kuis</i><par n="fax/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="kwetsen">         <i>kwets</i><par n="fax/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="lonen">           <i>lo</i><par n="to/nen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="lonken">          <i>lonk</i><par n="fax/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="lunchen">         <i>lunch</i><par n="fax/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="meuken">          <i>meuk</i><par n="fax/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="morsen">          <i>mors</i><par n="fax/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="niesen">          <i>nies</i><par n="fax/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="oliën">           <i>oli</i><par n="oli/ën__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="onthutsen">       <i>onthuts</i><par n="fax/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ontvolken">       <i>ontvolk</i><par n="fax/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="overstelpen">     <i>overstelp</i><par n="fax/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="pieken">          <i>piek</i><par n="fax/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="pijpen">          <i>pijp</i><par n="fax/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="poepen">          <i>poep</i><par n="fax/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="prediken">        <i>predik</i><par n="fax/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="reiken">          <i>reik</i><par n="fax/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="rolschaatsen">    <i>rolschaats</i><par n="fax/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ruziën">          <i>ruzi</i><par n="oli/ën__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="scherpen">        <i>scherp</i><par n="fax/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="schetsen">        <i>schets</i><par n="fax/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="schransen">       <i>schrans</i><par n="fax/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sleeën">          <i>slee</i><par n="slee/ën__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="snurken">         <i>snurk</i><par n="fax/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="stalken">         <i>stalk</i><par n="fax/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sterken">         <i>sterk</i><par n="fax/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tanken">          <i>tank</i><par n="fax/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tonen">           <i>to</i><par n="to/nen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="traliën">         <i>trali</i><par n="oli/ën__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tronen">          <i>tro</i><par n="to/nen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="typen">           <i>typ</i><par n="fax/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="verdampen">       <i>verdamp</i><par n="fax/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="verduidelijken">  <i>verduidelijk</i><par n="fax/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="verengelsen">     <i>verengels</i><par n="fax/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="vergemakkelijken"><i>vergemakkelijk</i><par n="fax/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="verminken">       <i>vermink</i><par n="fax/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="verplaatsen">     <i>verplaats</i><par n="fax/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="verschansen">     <i>verschans</i><par n="fax/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="verschonen">      <i>verscho</i><par n="to/nen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="vertonen">        <i>verto</i><par n="to/nen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="verversen">       <i>ververs</i><par n="fax/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="vloeken">         <i>vloek</i><par n="fax/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="vorsen">          <i>vors</i><par n="fax/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="weerkaatsen">     <i>weerkaats</i><par n="fax/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="wonen">           <i>wo</i><par n="to/nen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="zeiken">          <i>zeik</i><par n="fax/en__vblex"/></e>
